California, session 20252026, SB816.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 243 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:243. (a) For lien dates occurring on or after January 1, 2025, to, and including, January 1, 2030, real property impacted by the Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event is exempt from property taxation.(b) For purposes of this section, “Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event” means the elevated temperature landfill event, beginning on May 1, 2022, that occurred beneath the Chiquita Canyon Landfill in the County of Los Angeles, California.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 3. Notwithstanding Section 2229 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, no appropriation is made by this act and the state shall not reimburse any local agency for any property tax revenues lost by it pursuant to this act.SEC. 4. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.